Utah statutes.
45-3-2.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Advertisement" means a notice designed to attract public attention or
patronage and includes a list of supporters for a particular cause.
(2) "Cause the publication" means that a person prepares or requests another
to prepare an advertisement of the type described in Subsection 45-3-3(1), and
that person submits or requests another to submit the advertisement to a
publisher, and the advertisement has been published.
(3) (a)  "Consent" means a person's voluntary agreement to the use of that
person's name, title, picture, or portrait.
(b)  "Consent" may not be inferred by the failure of the person to request
that the person's name, title, picture, or portrait not be used or that the
person's name be removed from a mailing or supporter list.
(4)  "Individual" means a natural person.
(5)  "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, joint venture, or any other form of business organization or
arrangement, and the agents or representatives of such persons.
(6)  "Personal identity" means an individual's name, title, picture, or
portrait.
(7)  "Publish" means that a person provides the instrumentality through which
an advertisement is communicated to the public at large or to a significant
portion thereof.
